Ohio, session 136, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5503.02 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5503.02. (A) The state highway patrol shall enforce the laws of the state relating to the titling, registration, and licensing of motor vehicles; enforce on all roads and highways, notwithstanding section 4513.39 of the Revised Code, the laws relating to the operation and use of vehicles on the highways; enforce and prevent the violation of the laws relating to the size, weight, and speed of commercial motor vehicles and all laws designed for the protection of the highway pavements and structures on the highways; investigate and enforce rules and laws of the public utilities commission governing the transportation of persons and property by motor carriers and report violations of such rules and laws to the commission; enforce against any motor carrier as defined in section 4923.01 of the Revised Code those rules and laws that, if violated, may result in a forfeiture as provided in section 4923.99 of the Revised Code; investigate and report violations of all laws relating to the collection of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels; and regulate the movement of traffic on the roads and highways of the state, notwithstanding section 4513.39 of the Revised Code. The patrol, whenever possible, shall determine the identity of the persons who are causing or who are responsible for the breaking, damaging, or destruction of any improved surfaced roadway, structure, sign, marker, guardrail, or other appurtenance constructed or maintained by the department of transportation and shall arrest the persons who are responsible for the breaking, damaging, or destruction and bring them before the proper officials for prosecution. State highway patrol troopers shall investigate and report all motor vehicle accidents on all roads and highways outside of municipal corporations. The superintendent of the patrol or any state highway patrol trooper may arrest, without a warrant, any person, who is the driver of or a passenger in any vehicle operated or standing on a state highway, whom the superintendent or trooper has reasonable cause to believe is guilty of a misdemeanor or felony, under the same circumstances and with the same power that any peace officer may make such an arrest. The superintendent or any state highway patrol trooper may enforce the criminal laws on all state properties and state institutions, owned or leased by the state, and, when so ordered by the governor in the event of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, may, pursuant to sections 2935.03 to 2935.05 of the Revised Code, arrest offenders against the criminal laws wherever they may be found within the state if the violations occurred upon, or resulted in injury to person or property on, state properties or state institutions, or under the conditions described in division (B) of this section. This authority of the superintendent and any state highway patrol trooper to enforce the criminal laws shall extend to the Lake Erie Correctional Institution and the Northeast Ohio Correctional Center, to the same extent as if those prisons were owned by this state. (B) In the event of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, or the reasonable threat of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, and upon request, as provided in this section, of the sheriff of a county or the mayor or other chief executive of a municipal corporation, the governor may order the state highway patrol to enforce the criminal laws within the area threatened by riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, as designated by the governor, upon finding that law enforcement agencies within the counties involved will not be reasonably capable of controlling the riot, civil disorder, or insurrection and that additional assistance is necessary. In cities in which the sheriff is under contract to provide exclusive police services pursuant to section 311.29 of the Revised Code, in villages, and in the unincorporated areas of the county, the sheriff has exclusive authority to request the use of the patrol. In cities in which the sheriff does not exclusively provide police services, the mayor, or other chief executive performing the duties of mayor, has exclusive authority to request the use of the patrol. The superintendent or any state highway patrol trooper may enforce the criminal laws within the area designated by the governor during the emergency arising out of the riot, civil disorder, or insurrection until released by the governor upon consultation with the requesting authority. State highway patrol troopers shall never be used as peace officers in connection with any strike or labor dispute. When a request for the use of the patrol is made pursuant to this division, the requesting authority shall notify the law enforcement authorities in contiguous communities and the sheriff of each county within which the threatened area, or any part of the threatened area, lies of the request, but the failure to notify the authorities or a sheriff shall not affect the validity of the request. (C) Any person who is arrested by the superintendent or a state highway patrol trooper shall be taken before any court or magistrate having jurisdiction of the offense with which the person is charged. Any person who is arrested or apprehended within the limits of a municipal corporation shall be brought before the municipal court or other tribunal of the municipal corporation. (D)(1) State highway patrol troopers have the same right and power of search and seizure as other peace officers. No state official shall command, order, or direct any state highway patrol trooper to perform any duty or service that is not authorized by law. The powers and duties conferred on the patrol are supplementary to, and in no way a limitation on, the powers and duties of sheriffs or other peace officers of the state. (2)(a) A state highway patrol trooper, pursuant to the policy established by the superintendent of the state highway patrol under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, may render emergency assistance to any other peace officer who has arrest authority under section 2935.03 of the Revised Code, at the request of the other peace officer or any sheriff or chief of police. A state highway patrol trooper also may render emergency assistance to any other peace officer if both of the following apply: (i) There is a threat of imminent physical danger to the peace officer, a threat of physical harm to another person, or any other serious emergency situation; (ii) Either the peace officer requests emergency assistance, or it appears that the peace officer is unable to request emergency assistance and the circumstances observed by the state highway patrol trooper reasonably indicate that emergency assistance is appropriate, or the peace officer requests emergency assistance and in the request the peace officer specifies a particular location and the state highway patrol trooper arrives at that location prior to the time that the peace officer arrives at that location and the circumstances observed by the state highway patrol trooper reasonably indicate that emergency assistance is appropriate. (b) The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall establish, within sixty days of August 8, 1991, a policy that sets forth the manner and procedures by which a state highway patrol trooper may render assistance or emergency assistance to any other peace officer under division (D)(2)(a) of this section. The policy shall include a provision that a state highway patrol trooper never be used as a peace officer in connection with any strike or labor dispute. (3)(a) A state highway patrol trooper who renders assistance or emergency assistance to any other peace officer under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section shall be considered to be performing regular employment for the purposes of compensation, pension, indemnity fund rights, workers' compensation, and other rights or benefits to which the trooper may be entitled as incident to regular employment. (b) A state highway patrol trooper who renders assistance or emergency assistance to any other peace officer under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section retains personal immunity from liability as specified in section 9.86 of the Revised Code. (c) A state highway patrol trooper who renders assistance or emergency assistance under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section has the same authority as the peace officer for or with whom the state highway patrol trooper is providing emergency assistance. (E)(1) Subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated by the general assembly for security detail purposes, the state highway patrol shall provide security as follows: (a)(i) For the governor, the lieutenant governor, the governor-elect, the lieutenant governor-elect, and, at the direction of the governor, any eligible candidate upon the request of the candidate; (ii) For the purpose of division (E)(1)(a)(i) of this division, "eligible candidate" means any of the following: (I) A candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, upon being endorsed by the state central committee of a political party as defined in division (F) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code; (II) A candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, upon being nominated in a primary election as a party candidate for election at the next general election by a political party as defined in division (F) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, as of the date that the results of the unofficial count conducted by the boards of elections under section 3505.30 of the Revised Code indicate that the candidate received the most votes in the primary election; (III) An independent candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, as of the date the independent candidate's name has been certified on the office-type ballot at a general election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and nominating petition; (IV) A candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, upon being certified to fill a vacancy on a general election ballot under division (E) or (F) of section 3513.311 of the Revised Code; (V) Any candidate for statewide elected office for whom the governor determines that a security detail is necessary. (b) At the direction of the governor, for other officials of the state government of this state; officials of the state governments of other states who are visiting this state; officials of the United States government who are visiting this state; officials of the governments of foreign countries or their political subdivisions who are visiting this state; or other officials or dignitaries who are visiting this state, including, but not limited to, members of trade missions; (c) For the capitol square, as defined in section 105.41 of the Revised Code; (d) For the Vern Riffe center and the James A. Rhodes state office tower, as directed by the department of public safety; (e) For other state property. (2) To carry out the security responsibilities of the patrol listed in division (E)(1) of this section, the superintendent may assign state highway patrol troopers to a separate unit that is responsible for security details. The number of troopers assigned to particular security details shall be determined by the superintendent. (3) The superintendent and any state highway patrol trooper, when providing security pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section, have the same arrest powers as other peace officers to apprehend offenders against the criminal laws who endanger or threaten the security of any person or state property being protected under division (E) of this section, no matter where the offense occurs. This arrest authority is concurrent with that of any other peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or any other law enforcement officer, as defined in section 2901.01 of the Revised Code, with jurisdiction at the respective location. The superintendent, any state highway patrol trooper, and any special police officer designated under section 5503.09 of the Revised Code, if providing security pursuant to division (E)(1)(c) of this section, shall enforce any rules governing capitol square adopted by the capitol square review and advisory board. (F) The governor may order the state highway patrol to undertake major criminal investigations that involve state property interests. If an investigation undertaken pursuant to this division results in either the issuance of a no bill or the filing of an indictment, the superintendent shall file a complete and accurate report of the investigation with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the house of representatives within fifteen days after the issuance of the no bill or the filing of an indictment. If the investigation does not have as its result any prosecutorial action, the superintendent shall, upon reporting this fact to the governor, file a complete and accurate report of the investigation with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. (G) The superintendent may purchase or lease real property and buildings needed by the patrol, negotiate the sale of real property owned by the patrol, rent or lease real property owned or leased by the patrol, and make or cause to be made repairs to all property owned or under the control of the patrol. Any instrument by which real property is acquired pursuant to this division shall identify the agency of the state that has the use and benefit of the real property as specified in section 5301.012 of the Revised Code. Sections 123.01 and 125.02 of the Revised Code do not limit the powers granted to the superintendent by this division. Section 2. That existing section 5503.02 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. Section 4. 1 2 3 4 5 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B Highway Safety Fund Group C 8400 764617 Security and Investigations $5,000,000 $5,000,000 D Highway Safety Fund Group Total $5,000,000 $5,000,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,000,000 $5,000,000 SECURITY AND INVESTIGATIONS On the effective date of this section, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $10,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Security, Investigations, and Policing Fund (Fund 8400). The foregoing appropriation item 764617, Security and Investigations, shall be used by the State Highway Patrol to provide security for the lieutenant governor, the governor-elect, the lieutenant governor-elect, and any eligible candidate upon the request of the candidate in accordance with division (E)(1)(a) of section 5503.02 of the Revised Code. Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 6. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is that the gubernatorial election is approaching in an atmosphere of increased political violence in the United States of America. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect.